Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.190

Bull breed restrictions.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association or corporation to turn upon or allow to run at large on any range area in this state any bull other than a registered bull of a recognized beef breed. All persons running cattle in common on any range area may, however, agree to run any purebred or crossbred bull of any breed, registered or unregistered, as they may deem appropriate for their area.

[ 1986 c 177 s 1; 1985 c 415 s 18; 1917 c 111 s 1; RRS s 3082. Formerly RCW 16.20.020.]